Illinois, session 104th, SB3985.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Protecting Religious Assembly in States of Emergency Act and 6may be referred to as the PRAISE Act. 7    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "place of 8worship" means a church, synagogue, mosque, temple, or other 9building, structure, or place used primarily for religious 10worship and includes the grounds of the building, structure, 11or place. 12    Section 10. Protection for places of worship. A place of 13worship is exempted from any order, rule, regulation, 14ordinance, resolution, or other directive issued by the State 15government or a unit of local government under an emergency or 16health or safety determination, declaration, or proclamation 17that requires closure or limitation of any business or other 18facility otherwise open to public use or patronage. This 19Section shall be construed to give to religious organizations 20and the organizations' places of worship the same degree of 21freedom to meet as is given to the most favored entity or set 22of entities.   SB3985- 2 -LRB104 19928 JRC 33378 b1    Section 15. Enforcement. A person or religious 2organization burdened or impaired by a violation of Section 10 3may bring a civil action for relief against the burden or 4impairment in a circuit court. A court may provide the 5following noninclusive relief: injunctive orders, compensatory 6damages, nominal damages, a finding of a violation, and, when 7malice or recklessness is demonstrated, punitive damages. 8    Section 20. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 9places of worship in a manner inconsistent with this Act. This 10Act is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 11Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 12exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 13by the State. 14    Section 100. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 15is amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 16    (20 ILCS 3305/7)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1057)17    Sec. 7. Emergency Powers of the Governor. In the event of a 18disaster, as defined in Section 4, the Governor may, by 19proclamation declare that a disaster exists. Upon such 20proclamation, the Governor shall have and may exercise for a 21period not to exceed 30 days the following emergency powers; 22provided, however, that the lapse of the emergency powers   SB3985- 3 -LRB104 19928 JRC 33378 b1shall not, as regards any act or acts occurring or committed 2within the 30-day period, deprive any person, firm, 3corporation, political subdivision, or body politic of any 4right or rights to compensation or reimbursement which he, 5she, it, or they may have under the provisions of this Act:6        (1) To suspend the provisions of any regulatory 7    statute prescribing procedures for conduct of State 8    business, or the orders, rules and regulations of any 9    State agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of 10    any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way 11    prevent, hinder or delay necessary action, including 12    emergency purchases, by the Illinois Emergency Management 13    Agency, in coping with the disaster.14        (2) To utilize all available resources of the State 15    government as reasonably necessary to cope with the 16    disaster and of each political subdivision of the State.17        (3) To transfer the direction, personnel or functions 18    of State departments and agencies or units thereof for the 19    purpose of performing or facilitating disaster response 20    and recovery programs.21        (4) On behalf of this State to take possession of, and 22    to acquire full title or a lesser specified interest in, 23    any personal property as may be necessary to accomplish 24    the objectives set forth in Section 2 of this Act, 25    including: airplanes, automobiles, trucks, trailers, 26    buses, and other vehicles; coal, oils, gasoline, and other   SB3985- 4 -LRB104 19928 JRC 33378 b1    fuels and means of propulsion; explosives, materials, 2    equipment, and supplies; animals and livestock; feed and 3    seed; food and provisions for humans and animals; clothing 4    and bedding; and medicines and medical and surgical 5    supplies; and to take possession of and for a limited 6    period occupy and use any real estate necessary to 7    accomplish those objectives; but only upon the undertaking 8    by the State to pay just compensation therefor as in this 9    Act provided, and then only under the following 10    provisions:11            a. The Governor, or the person or persons as the 12        Governor may authorize so to do, may forthwith take 13        possession of property for and on behalf of the State; 14        provided, however, that the Governor or persons shall 15        simultaneously with the taking, deliver to the owner 16        or his or her agent, if the identity of the owner or 17        agency is known or readily ascertainable, a signed 18        statement in writing, that shall include the name and 19        address of the owner, the date and place of the taking, 20        description of the property sufficient to identify it, 21        a statement of interest in the property that is being 22        so taken, and, if possible, a statement in writing, 23        signed by the owner, setting forth the sum that he or 24        she is willing to accept as just compensation for the 25        property or use. Whether or not the owner or agent is 26        known or readily ascertainable, a true copy of the   SB3985- 5 -LRB104 19928 JRC 33378 b1        statement shall promptly be filed by the Governor or 2        the person with the Director, who shall keep the 3        docket of the statements. In cases where the sum that 4        the owner is willing to accept as just compensation is 5        less than $1,000, copies of the statements shall also 6        be filed by the Director with, and shall be passed upon 7        by an Emergency Management Claims Commission, 8        consisting of 3 disinterested citizens who shall be 9        appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and 10        consent of the Senate, within 20 days after the 11        Governor's declaration of a disaster, and if the sum 12        fixed by them as just compensation be less than $1,000 13        and is accepted in writing by the owner, then the State 14        Treasurer out of funds appropriated for these 15        purposes, shall, upon certification thereof by the 16        Emergency Management Claims Commission, cause the sum 17        so certified forthwith to be paid to the owner. The 18        Emergency Management Claims Commission is hereby given 19        the power to issue appropriate subpoenas and to 20        administer oaths to witnesses and shall keep 21        appropriate minutes and other records of its actions 22        upon and the disposition made of all claims.23            b. When the compensation to be paid for the taking 24        or use of property or interest therein is not or cannot 25        be determined and paid under item a of this paragraph 26        (4), a petition in the name of The People of the State   SB3985- 6 -LRB104 19928 JRC 33378 b1        of Illinois shall be promptly filed by the Director, 2        which filing may be enforced by mandamus, in the 3        circuit court of the county where the property or any 4        part thereof was located when initially taken or used 5        under the provisions of this Act praying that the 6        amount of compensation to be paid to the person or 7        persons interested therein be fixed and determined. 8        The petition shall include a description of the 9        property that has been taken, shall state the physical 10        condition of the property when taken, shall name as 11        defendants all interested parties, shall set forth the 12        sum of money estimated to be just compensation for the 13        property or interest therein taken or used, and shall 14        be signed by the Director. The litigation shall be 15        handled by the Attorney General for and on behalf of 16        the State.17            c. Just compensation for the taking or use of 18        property or interest therein shall be promptly 19        ascertained in proceedings and established by judgment 20        against the State, that shall include, as part of the 21        just compensation so awarded, interest at the rate of 22        6% per annum on the fair market value of the property 23        or interest therein from the date of the taking or use 24        to the date of the judgment; and the court may order 25        the payment of delinquent taxes and special 26        assessments out of the amount so awarded as just   SB3985- 7 -LRB104 19928 JRC 33378 b1        compensation and may make any other orders with 2        respect to encumbrances, rents, insurance, and other 3        charges, if any, as shall be just and equitable.4        (5) When required by the exigencies of the disaster, 5    to sell, lend, rent, give, or distribute all or any part of 6    property so or otherwise acquired to the inhabitants of 7    this State, or to political subdivisions of this State, 8    or, under the interstate mutual aid agreements or compacts 9    as are entered into under the provisions of subparagraph 10    (5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6 to other states, and to 11    account for and transmit to the State Treasurer all funds, 12    if any, received therefor.13        (6) To recommend the evacuation of all or part of the 14    population from any stricken or threatened area within the 15    State if the Governor deems this action necessary.16        (7) To prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and 17    destinations in connection with evacuation.18        (8) To control ingress and egress to and from a 19    disaster area, the movement of persons within the area, 20    and the occupancy of premises therein.21        (9) To suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or 22    transportation of alcoholic beverages, firearms, 23    explosives, and combustibles.24        (10) To make provision for the availability and use of 25    temporary emergency housing.26        (11) A proclamation of a disaster shall activate the   SB3985- 8 -LRB104 19928 JRC 33378 b1    State Emergency Operations Plan, and political subdivision 2    emergency operations plans applicable to the political 3    subdivision or area in question and be authority for the 4    deployment and use of any forces that the plan or plans 5    apply and for use or distribution of any supplies, 6    equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, 7    stockpiled or arranged to be made available under this Act 8    or any other provision of law relating to disasters.9        (12) Control, restrict, and regulate by rationing, 10    freezing, use of quotas, prohibitions on shipments, price 11    fixing, allocation or other means, the use, sale or 12    distribution of food, feed, fuel, clothing and other 13    commodities, materials, goods, or services; and perform 14    and exercise any other functions, powers, and duties as 15    may be necessary to promote and secure the safety and 16    protection of the civilian population.17        (13) During the continuance of any disaster the 18    Governor is commander-in-chief of the organized and 19    unorganized militia and of all other forces available for 20    emergency duty. To the greatest extent practicable, the 21    Governor shall delegate or assign authority to the 22    Director to manage, coordinate, and direct all resources 23    by orders issued at the time of the disaster.24        (14) Prohibit increases in the prices of goods and 25    services during a disaster.26    Nothing in this Act allows the Governor or any other   SB3985- 9 -LRB104 19928 JRC 33378 b1governmental official to proclaim, declare, or otherwise issue 2any order that violates the Protecting Religious Assembly in 3States of Emergency Act. 4(Source: P.A. 102-485, eff. 8-20-21.)